District of Columbia statutes.
38-112

Masculine pronoun to include both male and female.

Wherever the masculine pronoun occurs in this chapter it shall be construed to apply to either male or female teachers or employees of the Board of Education.

June 20, 1906, 34 Stat. 321, ch. 3446, § 12
Apr. 22, 1968, 82 Stat. 102, Pub. L. 90-292, § 3(d)
1981 Ed., § 31-116.
1973 Ed., § 31-117.